Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.025

Depictions of victim created during forensic examination—Confidentiality.

(1) In a criminal proceeding, a depiction of a victim's genitals that was created during a sexual assault medical forensic examination, regardless of its format:

(a) Shall not be shown in open judicial proceedings; and

(b) Must be filed as a confidential document within the court file.

(2) An expert witness in a criminal proceeding may inspect, view, examine, and provide testimony on a depiction of a victim's genitals that was created during a sexual assault medical forensic examination.

(3) All depictions of a victim that was created during a sexual assault medical forensic examination must be filed as a confidential document within the court file.

[ 2024 c 297 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 297: See note following RCW 7.68.127.